Hawaii statutes.
§490:9-328 Priority of security interests
in investment property. The following rules govern priority among
conflicting security interests in the same investment property:

(1) A security interest held by a secured party
having control of investment property under section 490:9-106 has priority over
a security interest held by a secured party that does not have control of the
investment property.

(2) Except as otherwise provided in paragraphs (3)
and (4), conflicting security interests held by secured parties each of which
has control under section 490:9-106 rank according to priority in time of:

(A) If the collateral is a security,
obtaining control;

(B) If the collateral is a security
entitlement carried in a securities account and:

(i) If the secured party obtained control
under section 490:8-106(d)(1), the secured party's becoming the person for
which the securities account is maintained;

(ii) If the secured party obtained control
under section 490:8-106(d)(2), the securities intermediary's agreement to
comply with the secured party's entitlement orders with respect to security
entitlements carried or to be carried in the securities account; or

(iii) If the secured party obtained control
through another person under section 490:8-106(d)(3), the time on which
priority would be based under this paragraph if the other person were the
secured party; or

(C) If the collateral is a commodity contract
carried with a commodity intermediary, the satisfaction of the requirement for
control specified in section 490:9-106(b)(2) with respect to commodity
contracts carried or to be carried with the commodity intermediary.

(3) A security interest held by a securities
intermediary in a security entitlement or a securities account maintained with
the securities intermediary has priority over a conflicting security interest
held by another secured party.

(4) A security interest held by a commodity
intermediary in a commodity contract or a commodity account maintained with the
commodity intermediary has priority over a conflicting security interest held
by another secured party.

(5) A security interest in a certificated security in
registered form which is perfected by taking delivery under section
490:9-313(a) and not by control under section 490:9-314 has priority over a
conflicting security interest perfected by a method other than control.

(6) Conflicting security interests created by a
broker, securities intermediary, or commodity intermediary which are perfected
without control under section 490:9-106 rank equally.

(7) In all other cases, priority among conflicting
security interests in investment property is governed by sections 490:9-322 and
490:9-323. [L 2000, c 241, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next